Utah statutes.
63F-1-303.   Executive branch agencies -- Subscription by institutions.
(1)  An executive branch agency in accordance with its agency information
technology plan approved by the chief information officer shall:
(a)  subscribe to the information technology services provided by the
department; or
(b)  contract with one or more alternate private providers of information
technology services if the chief information officer determines that the
purchase of the services from a private provider will:
(i)  result in:
(A)  cost savings;
(B)  increased efficiency; or
(C)  improved quality of services; and
(ii)  not impair the interoperability of the state's information technology
services.
(2)  An institution of higher education may subscribe to the services provided
by the department if:
(a)  the president of the institution recommends that the institution
subscribe to the services of the department; and
(b)  the Board of Regents determines that subscription to the services of the
department will result in cost savings or increased efficiency to the
institution.
(3)  The following may subscribe to information technology services by
requesting that the services be provided from the department:
(a)  the legislative branch;
(b)  the judicial branch;
(c)  the State Board of Education;
(d)  a political subdivision of the state;
(e)  an agency of the federal government;
(f)  an independent entity as defined in Section 63E-1-102; and
(g)  an elective constitutional officer of the executive department as defined
in Subsection 63F-1-102(7)(b).
